Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-101.01
Trustee; potential conflict of
interest; actions required.

Any trustee of Wyuka Cemetery who would be required to take
any action or make any decision in the discharge of his or her official duties
that may cause financial benefit or detriment to him or her, a member of his
or her immediate family, or a business with which he or she is associated,
which is distinguishable from the effects of such action on the public generally
or a broad segment of the public, shall take the following actions as soon
as he or she is aware of such potential conflict or should reasonably be aware
of such potential conflict, whichever is sooner:

(1) Prepare
a written statement describing the matter requiring action or decision and
the nature of the potential conflict;

(2) Deliver
a copy of the statement to the person in charge of keeping records for the
board of trustees of Wyuka Cemetery who shall enter the statement onto the
public records of the board of trustees; and

(3)
Abstain from participating or voting on the matter in which the trustee has
a conflict of interest.

Laws 2009, LB498, § 2.